Connecticut, session 2026, SB00214.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That subdivision (19) of section 12-81 of the general statutes be
amended to provide, for any property belonging to or held in trust for
any veteran or certain other military-related individual that is valued at
less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, a property tax
exemption in the amount of twenty thousand dollars off the assessed
value of such property.